Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1198.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 11d. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 168 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 168.303(6) Pub trst E Signing a nominating petition with multiple names 5 168.482e(3) Pub trst E Signing a petition with multiple names 5 168.544c(10) Pub trst E Signing a nominating petition with multiple names 5 168.590h(6) Pub trst E Signing a qualifying petition with multiple names 5 168.685(11) Pub trst E Signing a petition to form a new political party with multiple names 5 168.720j(14) Pub trst E Disclosing an election result from an early voting site before election day 5 168.731(4) Pub trst G Election law â filing certain false statements 2 168.734 Pub trst G Election law â election board refusing to provide challenger conveniences 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 168.756 Pub trst E Elector's false statement concerning inability to mark ballot 5 168.757 Pub trst E Election inspector â unlawful conduct 5 168.759(13) Pub trst E Forged signature on absentee ballot 5 168.759b Pub trst E False statement in application for emergency absentee ballot 5 168.761(5) Pub trst E Assisting an absentee voter in making a false statement 5 168.765a(9) Pub trst E Disclosing how ballot voted or election results early before polls are closed 5 168.769(4) Pub trst E Voting both in person and by absentee ballot 5 168.808 Pub trst E Untrue statement by member of board of inspectors 4 168.873 Pub trst E Individual interfering with a recount or activities relating to a recount 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 168.887 Pub trst E Individual interfering with a recount or activities relating to a recount 5 168.931b Person E Intimidating an election official or preventing an election official from performing the election official's duties â third or subsequent offense 5 168.932(a) Pub trst E Bribing or intimidating voters 5 168.932(b) Pub trst E Ballot tampering 5 168.932(c) Pub trst E Destroying or falsifying election return or records 5 168.932(d) Pub trst E Disclosing votes or obstructing voter 5 168.932(e) Pub trst E Absentee ballot tampering 5 168.932(f) Pub trst E Election law â possess absent voter ballot delivered to another person 5 168.932(g) Pub trst E Suggesting how a disabled voter should vote 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 168.932(h) Pub trst E Suggesting or influencing how an absentee voter should vote 5 168.932(i) Pub trst E Organizing a meeting where absentee voter ballots are to be voted 5 168.932a Pub trst G Election offenses 4 168.932c Pub trst E Providing compensation to a person for registering individuals to vote 5 168.932e Pub trst E Person intentionally misrepresenting that the person is an election official in a polling place 5 168.932f Pub trst E Distributing or agreeing to distribute materially deceptive media â certain subsequent offense 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 168.932n Pub trst E Unauthorized presence or conduct by military or certain federal officers or members at or during an election - third or subsequent offense 5 168.936 Pub trst E Election law â perjury 5 168.937 Pub trst E Election law â forgery 5 168.954(4) Pub trst E Signing a recall petition with multiple names 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 1197 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.